Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.395

Insurance for retired employees and their dependents—Method of payment of premium.

A group disability insurance policy, health care service contract, health maintenance agreement, or health and welfare benefit plan that provides benefits to retired school district employees and eligible dependents shall not require the beneficiary to make payment by monthly deduction from the beneficiary's state retirement allowance if the payment exceeds the retirement allowance. In such cases, the payment may be made directly by the individual beneficiary.

[ 1992 c 152 s 3.]